Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 45. Actions Relating to Real Property.

Cross references. —

For actions for certain injuries to property interests, see AS

09.65.220

,

09.65.255

, and AS 34.50.

For a temporary moratorium on the eviction of a person experiencing financial hardship during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 21, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary moratorium on real property foreclosure during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 24, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.